src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Vorsp/ann__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON W/ald__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Werkst/att__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCQen/DATQen/GENQen/NOMQen ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON W/olf__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: 0s-SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON W/unsch__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON W/urm__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON W/urst__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Zahn/arzt__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENs ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Zank/apfel__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQ/DATQn/GENQ/NOMQ ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Z/apf__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;

LEXICON Z/aun__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Z/oll__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Zuw/achs__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON L/ager__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACC/DATn/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: PL-ACCQ/DATQn/GENQ/NOMQ ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON P/ark__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCs/DATs/GENs/NOMs ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON St/aub__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-GENes ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Absurd/um__n_nt !!= * @CODE@ Absurdum:Absurd
+N+Neu:a PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu:um SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Agend/a__n_f !!= * @CODE@ Agenda:Agend
+N+Fem:en PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Fem:a SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON Alb/um__n_nt !!= * @CODE@ Album:Alb
+N+Neu:en PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu:um SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Algorithm/us__n_m !!= * @CODE@ Algorithmus:Algorithm
+N+Msc:en PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:us SG-ACC/DAT/GENses/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON Allegr/o__n_nt !!= * @CODE@ Allegro:Allegr
+N+Neu:i PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu:os PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu:o SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Anan/as__n_f !!= * @CODE@ Ananas:Ananas
+N+Fem:s%^Umlaut PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Arabisch__n_nt !!= * @CODE@ Arabisch:Arabisch
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACCe/DATen/GENen/NOMe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Arom/a__n_nt !!= * @CODE@  Aroma: Arom
+N+Neu:en PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu:a SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N:a SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Atla/s__n_m !!= * @CODE@ Atlas:Atla
+N+Msc:nten PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:ss PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Msc:s SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:s SG-DATse ;
+N+Msc:s SG-GENses ;

LEXICON Ausdr/uck__n_m !!= * @CODE@ 
!-- FIXME split meanings -->
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;


LEXICON Bab/y__n_nt !!= * @CODE@ Baby:Bab
+N+Neu:ys PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG:ies PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu:y SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

!LEXICON B/ank__n_f !!= * @CODE@ 
!-- FIXME split meanings --><e><p><l>Zen</l>     <r><s n="PL-ACC"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e><e><p><l>Zen</l>     <r><s n="PL-DAT"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e><e r="LR"><p><l>Qen</l>     <r><s n="PL-DAT"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e><e><p><l>Zen</l>     <r><s n="PL-GEN"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e><e><p><l>Zen</l>     <r><s n="PL-NOM"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e><e><p><l>Qe</l>      <r><s n="PL-ACC"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e><e><p><l>Qe</l>      <r><s n="PL-GEN"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e><e><p><l>Qe</l>      <r><s n="PL-NOM"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e><e><p><l>Z</l>       <r><s n="SG-ACC"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e><e><p><l>Z</l>       <r><s n="SG-DAT"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e><e><p><l>Z</l>       <r><s n="SG-GEN"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e><e><p><l>Z</l>       <r><s n="SG-NOM"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e> </pardef>
LEXICON Bas/is__n_f !!= * @CODE@ Basis:Bas
+N+Fem:en PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Fem:is SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N:en PL-CMP-L ; 
+N:is SG-CMP-L ; 

LEXICON Bass/o__n_m !!= * @CODE@ Basso:Bass
+N+Msc:i PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:o SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON Bau__n_m !!= * @CODE@ 
+N+Msc:ten PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Bronchiti/s__n_f !!= * @CODE@ Bronchitis:Bronchiti
+N+Fem:den PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Fem:s SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON Business__n_nt !!= * @CODE@ 
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;

LEXICON Unverständnis__n_nt !!= * @CODE@ Kein Mehrzahl
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENses/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATse ;


LEXICON Camp/us__n_m !!= * @CODE@ Campus:Camp
+N+Msc:i PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:us SG-ACC/DAT/GENses/GEN/NOM ;
+N:us SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Cell/o__n_nt !!= * @CODE@ Cello:Cell
+N+Neu:i PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu:o SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N:o SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Cembal/o__n_nt !!= * @CODE@ Cembalo:Cembal
+N+Neu:i PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu:o SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N:o SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Chairm/an__n_m !!= * @CODE@ Chairman:Chairm
+N+Msc:en PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:an SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N:an SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Charm/e__n_m !!= * @CODE@ Charme:Charm
+N+Msc:e SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc: SG-GENs ;

LEXICON Cod/ex__n_m !!= * @CODE@ Codex:Cod
+N+Msc:e PL-ACC/DATn/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:ices PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:ex SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GEN/NOM ;
+N:ex SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Cont/e__n_m !!= * @CODE@ Conte:Cont
+N+Msc:i PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:e SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON Corp/us__n_nt !!= * @CODE@ Corpus:Corp
+N+Neu:ora PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu:us SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N:us SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Cyberspac/e__n_m !!= * @CODE@ 
+N+Msc:es PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:e SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-GENs ;

LEXICON Dem/os__n_m !!= * @CODE@ Demos:Dem
+N+Msc:en PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:os SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON Disk/us__n_m !!= * @CODE@ Diskus:Disk
+N+Msc:en PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:usse PL-ACC/DATn/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:us SG-ACC/DAT/GENses/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:usse SG-DATe ;
+N:us SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Donn/a__n_f !!= * @CODE@ Donna:Donn
+N+Fem:as PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Fem:en PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Fem:a SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON Ep/os__n_nt !!= * @CODE@ Epos:Ep
+N+Neu:en PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu:os SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON Espress/o__n_m !!= * @CODE@ Espresso:Espress
+N+Msc:i PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:os PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:o SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N:o SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Exam/en__n_nt !!= * @CODE@ Examen:Exam
+N+Neu:en PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu:ina PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu:en SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Federvie/h__n_nt !!= * @CODE@ Federvieh:Federvie
+N+Neu:cher PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu:h SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N:h SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Gefolgs/mann__n_m !!= * @CODE@ Gefolgsmann:GEfolgs
+N+Msc:leute  PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:mann  SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG:mann SG-DATe ;

LEXICON Gentlem/an__n_m !!= * @CODE@ Gentleman:Gentlem
+N+Msc:en PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:an SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Hand/ling__n_nt !!= * @CODE@ Handling
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Hero/s__n_m !!= * @CODE@ Heros:Hero
+N+Msc:en PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc:s SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Herz__n_nt !!= * @CODE@ 
+N+Neu:  SG-ACC/DATen/GENens/NOM ;
!!CHECKME
