src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Nouns 
Basilika:Basilik Agend/a__n_f ;
Summa:Summ Agend/a__n_f ;
Tundra:Tundr Agend/a__n_f ;
Peseta:Peset Agend/a__n_f ;
Aktiva:Aktiv Agend/a__n_f ;
Mundharmonika:Mundharmonik Donn/a__n_f ;
Tombola:Tombol Donn/a__n_f ;
Donna:Donn Donn/a__n_f ;
Sauna:Saun Donn/a__n_f ;
Meningitis:Meningitis Bronchiti/s__n_f ;
Bronchitis:Bronchitis Bronchiti/s__n_f ;
Ananas:Ananas Anan/as__n_f ;
Basis:Bas Bas/is__n_f ;
Thesis:Thes Bas/is__n_f ;
Dosis:Dos Bas/is__n_f ;
Pyrosis:Pyros Bas/is__n_f ;
Fahrpraxis:Fahrprax Bas/is__n_f ;
Wurst:Wurst W/urst__n_f ;
Leberwurst:Leberwurst W/urst__n_f ;
Bratwurst:Bratwurst W/urst__n_f ;
Blutwurst:Blutwurst W/urst__n_f ;
Kfz-Werkstatt:Kfz-Werkstatt Werkst/att__n_f ;
Werkstatt:Werkstatt Werkst/att__n_f ;
Staub:Staub St/aub__n_m ;
Kohlenstaub:Kohlenstaub St/aub__n_m ;
Nebelwald:Nebelwald W/ald__n_m ;
Nadelwald:Nadelwald W/ald__n_m ;
Regenwald:Regenwald W/ald__n_m ;
Eichenwald:Eichenwald W/ald__n_m ;
Urwald:Urwald W/ald__n_m ;
Cyberspace:Cyberspace Cyberspac/e__n_m ;
Jade:Jad Charm/e__n_m ;
Lifestyle:Lifestyl Charm/e__n_m ;
Charme:Charm Charm/e__n_m ;
Conte:Cont Cont/e__n_m ;
Wolf:Wolf W/olf__n_m ;
Erdwolf:Erdwolf W/olf__n_m ;
Seewolf:Seewolf W/olf__n_m ;
Mähnenwolf:Mähnenwolf W/olf__n_m ;
Werwolf:Werwolf W/olf__n_m ;
Zapf:Zapf Z/apf__n_m ;
Wunsch:Wunsch W/unsch__n_m ;
Glückwunsch:Glückwunsch W/unsch__n_m ;
Ausdruck:Ausdruck Ausdr/uck__n_m ;
Park:Park P/ark__n_m ;
Zoll:Zoll Z/oll__n_m ;
Bandwurm:Bandwurm W/urm__n_m ;
Regenwurm:Regenwurm W/urm__n_m ;
Bücherwurm:Bücherwurm W/urm__n_m ;
Ohrwurm:Ohrwurm W/urm__n_m ;
Holzwurm:Holzwurm W/urm__n_m ;
Gentleman:Gentleman Gentlem/an__n_m ;
Chairman:Chairman Chairm/an__n_m ;
Vorspann:Vorspann Vorsp/ann__n_m ;
Gefolgsmann:Gefolgs Gefolgs/mann__n_m ;
Zaun:Zaun Z/aun__n_m ;
Drahtzaun:Drahtzaun Z/aun__n_m ;
Basso:Basso Bass/o__n_m ;
Sinto:Sinto Bass/o__n_m ;
Espresso:Espress Espress/o__n_m ;
Atlas:Atla Atla/s__n_m ;
Heros:Hero Hero/s__n_m ;
Zuwachs:Zuwachs Zuw/achs__n_m ;
Demos:Dem Dem/os__n_m ;
Diskus:Diskus Disk/us__n_m ;
Primarius:Primari Algorithm/us__n_m ;
Zyklus:Zykl Algorithm/us__n_m ;
Mimus:Mim Algorithm/us__n_m ;
Liberalismus:Liberalism Algorithm/us__n_m ;
Aphorismus:Aphorism Algorithm/us__n_m ;
Primus:Prim Camp/us__n_m ;
Terminus:Termin Camp/us__n_m ;
Campus:Camp Camp/us__n_m ;
Gestus:Gest Camp/us__n_m ;
Bau:Bau Bau__n_m ;
Abbau:Abbau Bau__n_m ;
Aufbau:Aufbau Bau__n_m ;
Einbau:Einbau Bau__n_m ;
Ausbau:Ausbau Bau__n_m ;
Codex:Codex Cod/ex__n_m ;
Panorama:Panoram Arom/a__n_nt ;
Thema:Them Arom/a__n_nt ;
Aroma:Arom Arom/a__n_nt ;
Neoplasma:Neoplasm Arom/a__n_nt ;
Zytoplasma:Zytoplasm Arom/a__n_nt ;
Handling:Handling Hand/ling__n_nt ;
Federvieh:Federvie Federvie/h__n_nt ;
Altnordisch:Altnordisch Arabisch__n_nt ;
Englisch:Englisch Arabisch__n_nt ;
Japanisch:Japanisch Arabisch__n_nt ;
Bosnisch:Bosnisch Arabisch__n_nt ;
Litauisch:Litauisch Arabisch__n_nt ;
Stadium:Stadi Alb/um__n_nt ;
Universitätsstudium:Universitätsstudi Alb/um__n_nt ;
Gesundheitsministerium:Gesundheitsministeri  Alb/um__n_nt ;
Direktorium:Direktori Alb/um__n_nt ;
Universum:Univers Alb/um__n_nt ;
Antiarrhythmikum:Antiarrhythmik Absurd/um__n_nt ;
Politikum:Politik Absurd/um__n_nt ;
Antiseptikum:Antiseptik Absurd/um__n_nt ;
Maximum:Maxim Absurd/um__n_nt ;
Fatum:Fat Absurd/um__n_nt ;
Examen:Exam Exam/en__n_nt ;
Pronomen:Pronom Exam/en__n_nt ;
Personalpronomen:Personalpronom Exam/en__n_nt ;
Possessivpronomen:Possessivpronom Exam/en__n_nt ;
Cembalo:Cembal Cembal/o__n_nt ;
Cello:Cell Cell/o__n_nt ;
Violoncell:Violoncello Cell/o__n_nt ;
Tempo:Temp Allegr/o__n_nt ;
Allegro:Allegr Allegr/o__n_nt ;
Moderato:Moderat Allegr/o__n_nt ;
Lamento:Lament Allegr/o__n_nt ;
Scherzo:Scherz Allegr/o__n_nt ;
Lager:Lager L/ager__n_nt ;
Ferienlager:Ferienlager L/ager__n_nt ;
Epos:Epos Ep/os__n_nt ;
Unverständnis:Unverständnis Unverständnis__n_nt ;
Nass:Nass Business__n_nt ;
Business:Business Business__n_nt ;
Malz:Malz Business__n_nt ;
Corpus:Corpus Corp/us__n_nt ;
Baby:Bab Bab/y__n_nt ;
Hobby:Hobb Bab/y__n_nt ;
Sherry:Sherr Bab/y__n_nt ;
Herz:Herz Herz__n_nt ;
